src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON LÅSSÅT !!= @CODE@ Two attr, two comp. As f3. in Spiik. So far the only word i this lexicon i "låssåt", because both låssis and låsså are attr and comparative is both låsep(hybrid?) and låssådabbo.
                              +Use/NG:is%>          ATTR           ;
                                     :å%>           ATTR           ;
                                     :åt            VUOHTA         ;
                                     :åt%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     :åd%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                              +Use/NG:åd%>          ABBO/AMOS      ;
                                     :e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ; ! Because we want låsebut
! +Der1+Der/Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    K-CONS         ;
              +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
                 +Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t K-CONS         ;
                     +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åd%>it        K-CONS         ;
                            +Cmp/SgNom:åt%>          R              ;
                                     :åd%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: låssåt # Odd-syllable test
!!€ låssåt:               låssåt+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ låssådav:             låssåt+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ låssis:               låssåt+A+Attr
!!€ låsså:                låssåt+A+Attr
!!€ låssådabbo:           låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ låsep:                låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON STUORAK !!= @CODE@  Only for stuorak. It hase two attributes. Has even-syllable comparison: stuoráp and stuorámus.Sg Acc: stuoragav, attr: stuor and stuorra. This might be a -k derivation of adjective stuorre attr stuor(ra). The comparison is thus based on the original adjective and thus it naturally is an even syll comparison.
                   :%>     ATTR           ;
            +Use/NG:ra%>   ATTR           ;
                   :ak     VUOHTA         ;
                   :ak%>   N-ODDCASE      ;
                   :ag%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :á%>    BU/MUS         ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>it K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:ak%>   R              ;
                   :ag%>   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: stuorak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ stuorak:               stuorak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ stuoragav:             stuorak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ stuorra:               stuorak+A+Attr
!!€ stuor:                 stuorak+A+Attr
!!€ stuoráp:               stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON ALLAK !!= @CODE@ Adjs on -ak, attr.on -a. Have both gasep/gaggagabbo and alep/allagabbo as comparatives. As d. in Spiik. So far only the adjectives "allak" and "gassak" go to this lexicon.
                                     :a%>           ATTR           ;
! :a VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                                     :ak            VUOHTA         ;
                                     :ak%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     :ag%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                                     :e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
                                     +Use/NG:ag%>          ABBO/AMOS      ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ;
! +Der1+Der/Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>appot K ;
! +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>abmus%>it K ;
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    K-CONS         ;
              +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t K-CONS         ;
                     +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>it        K-CONS          ;
                            +Cmp/SgNom:ak%>          R              ;
                                      :ag%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: gassak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gassak:               gassak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gassagav:             gassak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gassa:                gassak+A+Attr
!!€ gassagabbo:           gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gasep:                gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom

LEXICON GÅBDDÅK !!= @CODE@  Adjs on -åk, attr. on -å. Has even-syllable comparison: gåbdep and gåbdemus. So far "gåbddåk" is the only word in this lexicon. As d2. in Spiik. Sg Acc: gåbddågav, Attr: gåbddå.

                                     :å%>           ATTR           ;
                                     :åk            VUOHTA         ;
                                     :åk%>          N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                                     :åg%>          OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                                     :e%>Q1         BU/MUS         ;
! +Der1+Der/Comp:e%>Q1 BUStem ;
! +Der1+Der/Superl:e%>Q1muss BUOREMUS ;
                +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>appot     K-CONS         ;
              +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>abmus%>it K-CONS         ;
            +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:e»Q1busj%>    K-CONS         ;
                +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1busj%>    ATTR           ;
                   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1buttja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:e»Q1budtja%>  ÁRMMOGIS-EVEN  ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:e»Q1buttja%>t K-CONS         ;
                     +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:åg%>it        K-CONS         ;
                             +Cmp/SgNom:åk%>          R              ;
                                       :åg%>          ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: gåbddåk # Odd-syllable test
!!€ gåbddåk:               gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ gåbddågav:             gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ gåbddå:                gåbddåk+A+Attr
!!€ gåbdep:                gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 




!!
!! Inherent comparatives and superlatives
!!
