src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
allak+A:all ALLAK ;
gassak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gass ALLAK ;
gåbddåk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåbdd GÅBDDÅK ;
låssåt+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:låss LÅSSÅT ;
stuorak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuor STUORAK ;
